Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,179
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating any provision of sections 60-4,175 to 60-4,178 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 380, § 8, p. 1194;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 77;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-409.13;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 129.